California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(5) The agent delivering dangerous drugs and dangerous devices pursuant to this subdivision leaves documents indicating the name and amount of each dangerous drug or dangerous device delivered in the secure storage facility.

The pharmacy shall be responsible for the dangerous drugs and dangerous devices delivered to the secure storage facility. The pharmacy shall also be responsible for obtaining and maintaining records relating to the delivery of dangerous drugs and dangerous devices to a secure storage facility.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (a),
 dangerous drugs and devices and controlled substances may be ordered by a remote dispensing site pharmacy licensed by the board and may be signed for and received by a registered pharmacy technician, who meets the qualifications of Section 4132, at the remote site. A controlled substance signed for by a pharmacy technician under this section shall be stored separately from existing inventory until the time the controlled substance is reviewed and countersigned by a pharmacist. Any receipt and storage of a controlled substance by a pharmacy technician pursuant to this section shall be captured on video, and that video shall be made accessible to the supervising pharmacy and maintained by the remote dispensing site pharmacy for 120 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 598, Sec. 5.5.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4060.

A person shall not possess any controlled substance, except that furnished to a person upon the prescription of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, optometrist, veterinarian, nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2837.103 or 2837.104, or naturopathic doctor pursuant to Section 3640.7, or furnished pursuant to a drug order issued by a certified nurse-midwife pursuant to Section 2746.51, a nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2836.1, a physician assistant pursuant to Section 3502.1, a naturopathic doctor pursuant to Section 3640.5, or a pharmacist pursuant to Section 4052.1, 4052.2, or 4052.6. This section does not apply to the possession of any controlled substance by a manufacturer, wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, pharmacy, pharmacist, physician, podiatrist, dentist, optometrist, veterinarian, naturopathic doctor,
 certified nurse-midwife, nurse practitioner, or physician assistant, if in stock in containers correctly labeled with the name and address of the supplier or producer.

This section does not authorize a certified nurse-midwife, a nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2836.1, a physician assistant, or a naturopathic doctor, to order their own stock of dangerous drugs and devices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 24.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4061.

(a) No manufacturer’s sales representative shall distribute any dangerous drug or dangerous device as a complimentary sample without the written request of a physician, dentist, podiatrist, optometrist, veterinarian, nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2837.103 or 2837.104, or naturopathic doctor pursuant to Section 3640.7. However, a certified nurse-midwife who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 2746.51, a nurse practitioner who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure described in Section 2836.1, or protocol, a physician assistant who functions pursuant to a protocol described in Section 3502.1, or a naturopathic doctor who functions pursuant to a standardized procedure or protocol described in Section 3640.5, may sign for
 the request and receipt of complimentary samples of a dangerous drug or dangerous device that has been identified in the standardized procedure, protocol, or practice agreement. Standardized procedures, protocols, and practice agreements shall include specific approval by a physician. A review process, consistent with the requirements of Section 2725, 3502.1, or 3640.5, of the complimentary samples requested and received by a nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2836.1, certified nurse-midwife, physician assistant, or naturopathic doctor, shall be defined within the standardized procedure, protocol, or practice agreement.

(b) Each written request shall contain the names and addresses of the supplier and the requester, the name and quantity of the specific dangerous drug desired, the name of the certified nurse-midwife, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or naturopathic doctor, if applicable, receiving the samples pursuant to
 this section, the date of receipt, and the name and quantity of the dangerous drugs or dangerous devices provided. These records shall be preserved by the supplier with the records required by Section 4059.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to expand the scope of practice of a certified nurse-midwife, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or naturopathic doctor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 25.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4062.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4059 or any other law, a pharmacist or a clinic licensed and acting under Section 4180 may, in good faith, furnish a dangerous drug or dangerous device in reasonable quantities without a prescription during a federal, state, or local emergency, to further the health and safety of the public. A record containing the date, name, and address of the person to whom the drug or device is furnished, and the name, strength, and quantity of the drug or device furnished shall be maintained. The pharmacist or clinic shall communicate this information to the patient’s attending physician as soon as possible. Notwithstanding Section 4060 or any other law, a person may possess a dangerous drug or dangerous device furnished without
 prescription pursuant to this section.

(b) During a declared federal, state, or local emergency, the board may waive application of any provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant to it if, in the board’s opinion, the waiver will aid in the protection of public health or the provision of patient care.

(c) During a declared federal, state, or local emergency, the board shall allow for the employment of a mobile pharmacy or clinic in impacted areas in order to ensure the continuity of patient care, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The mobile pharmacy or clinic shares common ownership with at least one currently licensed pharmacy or clinic in good standing.

(2) The mobile pharmacy or clinic retains records of dispensing, as required by subdivision (a).

(3) A licensed pharmacist, or, in the case of a clinic, a professional director, is on the premises and the mobile pharmacy is under the control and management of a pharmacist, or, in the case of a clinic, a professional director, while the drugs are being dispensed.

(4) Reasonable security measures are taken to safeguard the drug supply maintained in the mobile pharmacy or clinic.

(5) The mobile pharmacy or clinic is located within the declared emergency area or affected areas.

(6) The mobile pharmacy
 or clinic ceases the provision of services within 48 hours following the termination of the declared emergency.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may elect to continue to waive application of any provision of this chapter for up to 90 days following the termination of the declared emergency if, in the board’s opinion, the continued waiver will aid in the protection of the public health or in the provision of patient care.

(e) (1) A pharmacy that is destroyed or severely
 damaged as a result of a natural disaster or due to events that led to a declared federal, state, or local emergency, may be relocated. The relocation shall not be considered a transfer of ownership or location under Section 4110, if no changes are made to the management and control, or ownership, of the pharmacy and all applicable laws and regulations are followed. Notification of the relocation shall be provided to the board immediately upon identification of the new location.

(2) For
 purposes of this section, “severely damaged” means damage that renders the premises unsafe or unfit for entry or occupation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.   (AB 690)   Effective October 9, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4063.

No prescription for any dangerous drug or dangerous device may be refilled except upon authorization of the prescriber. The authorization may be given orally or at the time of giving the original prescription. No prescription for any dangerous drug that is a controlled substance may be designated refillable as needed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4064.

(a) A prescription for a dangerous drug or dangerous device may be refilled without the prescriber’s authorization if the prescriber is unavailable to authorize the refill and if, in the pharmacist’s professional judgment, failure to refill the prescription might interrupt the patient’s ongoing care and have a significant adverse effect on the patient’s well-being.

(b) The pharmacist shall inform the patient that the prescription was refilled pursuant to this section.

(c) The pharmacist shall inform the prescriber within a reasonable period of time of any refills dispensed pursuant to this section.

(d) The prescriber shall not incur any liability as the result of a refilling of a prescription pursuant to this section.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 4060 or any other law, a person may possess a dangerous drug or dangerous device furnished without prescription pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 23.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4064.5.

(a) A pharmacist may dispense not more than a 90-day supply of a dangerous drug other than a controlled substance pursuant to a valid prescription that specifies an initial quantity of less than a 90-day supply followed by periodic refills of that amount if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The patient has completed an initial 30-day supply of the dangerous drug.

(2) The total quantity of dosage units dispensed does not exceed the total quantity of dosage units authorized by the prescriber on the prescription, including refills.

(3) The
 prescriber has not specified on the prescription that dispensing the prescription in an initial amount followed by periodic refills is medically necessary.

(4) The pharmacist is exercising their professional judgment.

(b) For purposes of this section, if the prescription continues the same medication as previously dispensed in a 90-day supply, the initial 30-day supply under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is not required.

(c) A pharmacist dispensing an increased supply of a dangerous drug pursuant to this section shall notify the prescriber of the increase in the quantity of dosage units dispensed.

(d) This section shall not apply to psychotropic medication or psychotropic
 drugs as described in subdivision (d) of Section 369.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(e) This section does not apply to FDA-approved, self-administered hormonal contraceptives.

(1) A pharmacist shall furnish or dispense, at a patient’s request, up to a 12-month supply of an FDA-approved, self-administered hormonal contraceptive pursuant to a valid prescription that specifies an initial quantity followed by periodic refills.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require a pharmacist to dispense or furnish a drug if it would result in a violation of Section 733.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a health care
 service plan, health insurer, workers’ compensation insurance plan, pharmacy benefits manager, or any other person or entity, including, but not limited to, a state program or state employer, to provide coverage for a dangerous drug in a manner inconsistent with a beneficiary’s plan benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 24.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4065.

(a) “Injection card system,” as used in this section, means a system that enables a facility to authorize an outpatient to receive injections of controlled substances at the facility pursuant to a prior written order by a physician, through the use of a card that is maintained at the location in the facility where the injections are administered.

(1) The injection card shall include, at a minimum, the following information: the date of authorization, the number and frequency of injections authorized, the name of the drug including the strength and amount authorized, the names of the prescribing physician and the patient, the date and time of each injection, and the signature of the person administering the injection.

(2) In addition, the patient’s medical record maintained by the facility shall contain all of the information required under Sections 4040 and 4070 and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 70001) of Division 5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensed health care facility may provide for the administration of controlled substances through the use of an injection card system for controlled substances.

(c) A facility that employs an injection card system shall have a written protocol for the use of this system. The protocol shall be developed by a team of health care professionals, including at least one physician, one registered nurse, and one pharmacist. The protocol shall provide for, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Identification of drugs to be included in the injection card system.

(2) Distinction among classes of drugs.

(3) Periodic review of the efficacy of the injection card system, including, but not limited to, its effectiveness and safety for different classes of drugs.

(4) Determination as to whether each drug included in the injection card system requires the presence of a physician or only the ready availability of a physician.

(5) Implementation of recordkeeping systems that, at a minimum, record each injection and each visit, provide for the immediate entry of the injection in the patient’s medical record, provide a system for discontinuance of the order by the prescribing physician, and allow for ready identification of patterns of possible or actual patient abuse of controlled substances and other potential adverse drug interactions.

(6) Retention of the injection card by the facility at all times when a controlled substance is being administered.

(7) Adequate initial evaluation of patients, including, but not limited to, a determination as to whether each patient is a proper subject for the injection card system.

(8) Ongoing medical evaluation of the patient’s response to the injection card system.

(9) That all injection cards shall become a permanent part of the patient’s medical record within 15 days from the date the last authorized dose is administered.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the use, or impose new requirements on the use, of an injection card system for noncontrolled substances.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4066.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4059, a wholesaler or pharmacy may furnish dangerous drugs to the master or first officer of an ocean vessel, pursuant to a written prescription. The requisition shall be on the vessel’s official stationery, signed by the vessel’s first officer. The drugs shall be maintained on board the vessel and dispensed from medicine chests, first aid packets, or dispensaries, pursuant to standardized procedures established by a registered medical officer.

(b) Dangerous drugs shall be furnished in a sealed container to the vessel’s first officer, on proper identification, or delivered aboard the vessel.

(c) Wholesalers or pharmacies engaging in the activities authorized by this section shall give notice to the board within 30 days of undertaking the activity.

(d) Distribution of controlled substances shall be in accordance with federal requirements contained in Section 1301.28 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4067.

(a) No person or entity shall dispense or furnish, or cause to be dispensed or furnished, dangerous drugs or dangerous devices, as defined in Section 4022, on the internet for delivery to any person in this state without a prescription issued pursuant to an appropriate prior examination of the human or animal for whom the prescription is meant if the person or entity either knew or reasonably should have known that the prescription was not issued pursuant to an appropriate prior examination of the human or animal, or if the person or entity did not act in accordance with Section 1761 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
 violation of this section may subject the person or entity that has committed the violation to either a fine of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per occurrence pursuant to a citation issued by the board or a civil penalty of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per occurrence.

(c) The Attorney General may bring an action to enforce this section and to collect the fines or civil penalties authorized by subdivision (b).

(d) For notifications made on and after January 1, 2002, the Franchise Tax Board, upon notification by the Attorney General or the board of a final judgment in an action brought under this section, shall subtract the amount of the fine or awarded civil penalties from any tax refunds or lottery winnings due to the person who is a defendant in
 the action using the offset authority under Section 12419.5 of the Government Code, as delegated by the Controller, and the processes as established by the Franchise Tax Board for this purpose. That amount shall be forwarded to the board for deposit in the Pharmacy Board Contingent Fund.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the unlicensed practice of pharmacy, or to limit the authority of the board to enforce any other provision of this chapter.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “appropriate prior examination” includes the requirements for a physician and surgeon in Section 2242 and the requirements for a veterinarian in Section 4826.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 25.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4068.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, except as provided in subdivision (b), a prescriber may dispense a dangerous drug, including a controlled substance, to an emergency room patient if all of the following apply:

(1) The hospital pharmacy is closed and there is no pharmacist available in the hospital.

(2) The dangerous drug is acquired by the hospital pharmacy.

(3) The dispensing information is recorded and provided to the
 pharmacy when the pharmacy reopens.

(4) The hospital pharmacy retains the dispensing information and, if the drug is a schedule II, schedule III, or schedule IV controlled substance, reports the dispensing information to the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 11165 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) The prescriber determines that it is in the best interest of the patient that a particular drug regimen be immediately commenced or continued, and the prescriber reasonably believes that a pharmacy located outside the hospital is not available and accessible at the time of dispensing to the patient.

(6) The quantity of drugs dispensed to any patient pursuant to this section are limited to that amount
 necessary to maintain uninterrupted therapy during the period when pharmacy services outside the hospital are not readily available or accessible, but shall not exceed a 72-hour supply.

(7) The prescriber shall ensure that the label on the drug contains all the information required by Section 4076.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, including subdivision (a), a prescriber may dispense an unused portion of a dangerous drug acquired by the hospital pharmacy to an emergency room patient upon discharge under all of the following conditions:

(1) The dangerous drug is not a controlled substance.

(2) The dangerous drug has been ordered and administered to the emergency room patient.

(3) The dangerous drug was administered from single patient use multidose packaging and can be self-administered by the patient, including, but not limited to, an inhaler, eye drop, ear drop, nose drop or spray, topical product, or liquid product. 

(4) Dispensing the unused portion of the dangerous drug is required to continue treatment of the emergency room patient. 

(5) The prescriber shall ensure that
 the label on the drug contains all of the information required by Section 4076.

(c) The prescriber shall be responsible for any error or omission related to the drugs dispensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 363, Sec. 1.   (AB 447)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4069.

A pharmacist who dispenses or furnishes a dangerous drug, as defined in Section 4022, pursuant to a veterinary prescription shall include, as part of the consultation, the option for a representative of an animal patient to also receive drug documentation specifically designed for veterinary drugs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 15.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Requirements for Prescriptions [4070. - 4079.]

4070.

(a) Except as provided in Section 4019 and subdivision (b), an oral or an electronic data transmission prescription as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4040 shall as soon as practicable be reduced to writing by the pharmacist and shall be filled by, or under the direction of, the pharmacist. The pharmacist need not reduce to writing the address, telephone number, license classification, federal registry number of the prescriber or the address of the patient or patients if the information is readily retrievable in the pharmacy.

(b) A pharmacy receiving an electronic transmission prescription shall not be required to reduce that prescription to writing or to hard copy form if, for three years from the last date of furnishing pursuant to that prescription or order, the pharmacy is able, upon request by the board, to immediately produce a hard copy report that includes for each date of dispensing of a dangerous drug or dangerous device pursuant to that prescription or order: (1) all of the information described in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 4040, and (2) the name or identifier of the pharmacist who dispensed the dangerous drug or dangerous device. This subdivision shall not apply to prescriptions for controlled substances classified in Schedule II, III, IV, or V, except as permitted pursuant to Section 11164.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) If only recorded and stored electronically, on magnetic media, or in any other computerized form, the pharmacy’s computer system shall not permit the received information or the dangerous drug or dangerous device dispensing information required by this section to be changed, obliterated, destroyed, or disposed of, for the record maintenance period required by law once the information has been received by the pharmacy and once the dangerous drug or dangerous device has been dispensed. Once a dangerous drug or dangerous device has been dispensed, if the previously created record is determined to be incorrect, a correcting addition may be made only by or with the approval of a pharmacist. After a pharmacist enters the change or enters his or her approval of the change into the computer, the resulting record shall include the correcting addition and the date it was made to the record, the identity of the person or pharmacist making the correction, and the identity of the pharmacist approving the correction.

(d) Nothing in this section shall impair the requirement to have an electronically transmitted prescription transmitted only to the pharmacy of the patient’s choice or to have a written prescription. This requirement shall not apply to orders for medications to be administered in an acute care hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 293, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4071.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a prescriber may authorize his or her agent on his or her behalf to orally or electronically transmit a prescription to the furnisher. The furnisher shall make a reasonable effort to determine that the person who transmits the prescription is authorized to do so and shall record the name of the authorized agent of the prescriber who transmits the order.

This section shall not apply to orders for Schedule II controlled substances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4071.1.

(a) A prescriber, a prescriber’s authorized agent, or a pharmacist may electronically enter a prescription or an order, as defined in Section 4019, into a pharmacy’s or hospital’s computer from any location outside of the pharmacy or hospital with the permission of the pharmacy or hospital. For purposes of this section, a “prescriber’s authorized agent” is a person licensed or registered under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500).

(b) This section does not reduce the existing authority of other hospital personnel to enter medication orders or prescription orders into a hospital’s computer.

(c) A dangerous drug or dangerous device shall not be dispensed pursuant to a prescription that has been electronically entered into a pharmacy’s computer without the prior approval of a pharmacist.

(d) (1) A pharmacist located and licensed in the state may, on behalf of a health care facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, from a location outside of the facility, verify medication chart orders for appropriateness before administration consistent with federal requirements, as established in the health care facility’s policies and procedures.

 (2) (A) A health care facility shall maintain a record of a pharmacist’s verification of medication chart orders
 pursuant to this subdivision.

 (B) A record maintained pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall meet the same requirements as those described in Sections 4081 and 4105.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.   (AB 1557)   Effective September 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4072.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a pharmacist, registered nurse, licensed vocational nurse, licensed psychiatric technician, or other healing arts licentiate, if so authorized by administrative regulation, who is employed by or serves as a consultant for a licensed skilled nursing, intermediate care, or other health care facility, may orally or electronically transmit to the furnisher a prescription lawfully ordered by a person authorized to prescribe drugs or devices pursuant to Sections 4040 and 4070. The furnisher shall take appropriate steps to determine that the person who transmits the prescription is authorized to do so and shall record the name of the person who transmits the order. This section shall not apply to orders for
 Schedule II controlled substances.

(b) In enacting this section, the Legislature recognizes and affirms the role of the State Department of Public Health in regulating drug order processing requirements for licensed health care facilities as set forth in Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations as they may be amended from time to time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 25.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4073.

(a) A pharmacist filling a prescription order for a drug product prescribed by its trade or brand name may select another drug product with the same active chemical ingredients of the same strength, quantity, and dosage form, and of the same generic drug name as determined by the United States Adopted Names (USAN) and accepted by the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA), of those drug products having the same active chemical ingredients.

(b) In no case shall a selection be made pursuant to this section if the prescriber personally indicates, either orally or in his or her own handwriting, “Do not substitute,” or words of similar meaning. Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit a prescriber from checking a box on a prescription marked “Do not substitute”; provided that the prescriber personally initials the box or checkmark. To indicate that a selection shall not be made pursuant to this section for an electronic data transmission prescription as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4040, a prescriber may indicate “Do not substitute,” or words of similar meaning, in the prescription as transmitted by electronic data, or may check a box marked on the prescription “Do not substitute.” In either instance, it shall not be required that the prohibition on substitution be manually initialed by the prescriber.

(c) Selection pursuant to this section is within the discretion of the pharmacist, except as provided in subdivision (b). The person who selects the drug product to be dispensed pursuant to this section shall assume the same responsibility for selecting the dispensed drug product as would be incurred in filling a prescription for a drug product prescribed by generic name. There shall be no liability on the prescriber for an act or omission by a pharmacist in selecting, preparing, or dispensing a drug product pursuant to this section. In no case shall the pharmacist select a drug product pursuant to this section unless the drug product selected costs the patient less than the prescribed drug product. Cost, as used in this subdivision, is defined to include any professional fee that may be charged by the pharmacist.

(d) This section shall apply to all prescriptions, including those presented by or on behalf of persons receiving assistance from the federal government or pursuant to the California Medical Assistance Program set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(e) When a substitution is made pursuant to this section, the use of the cost-saving drug product dispensed shall be communicated to the patient and the name of the dispensed drug product shall be indicated on the prescription label, except where the prescriber orders otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 659, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4073.5.

(a) A pharmacist filling a prescription order for a prescribed biological product may select an alternative biological product only if all of the following:

(1) The alternative biological product is interchangeable.

(2) The prescriber does not personally indicate “Do not substitute,” or words of similar meaning, in the manner provided in subdivision (d).

(b) Within five days following the dispensing of a biological product, a dispensing pharmacist or the pharmacists’ designee shall make an entry of the specific biological product provided to the
 patient, including the name of the biological product and the manufacturer. The communication shall be conveyed by making an entry that can be electronically accessed by the prescriber through one or more of the following electronic records systems:

(1) An interoperable electronic medical records system.

(2) An electronic prescribing
 technology.

(3) A pharmacy benefit management system.

(4) A pharmacy record.

(c) Entry into an electronic records system as described in subdivision (b) is presumed to provide notice to the prescriber.

(d) If the
 pharmacy does not have access to one or more of the entry systems in subdivision (b), the pharmacist or the pharmacist’s designee shall communicate the name of the biological product dispensed to the prescriber using facsimile, telephone, electronic transmission, or other prevailing means, except that communication shall not be required in this instance to the prescriber when either of the following apply:

(1) There is no interchangeable biological product approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the product prescribed.

(2) A refill prescription is not changed from the product dispensed on the prior filling of the prescription.

(e) In no case shall a selection be made pursuant to this section if the prescriber personally indicates, either orally or in his or her own handwriting, “Do not substitute,” or words of similar meaning.

(1) This subdivision shall not prohibit a prescriber from checking a box on a prescription marked “Do not substitute,” provided that the prescriber personally initials the box or checkmark.

(2) To indicate that a selection shall not be made pursuant to this section for an electronic data transmission prescription, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 4040, a prescriber may indicate “Do not substitute,” or words of similar meaning, in
 the prescription as transmitted by electronic data, or may check a box marked on the prescription “Do not substitute.” In either instance, it shall not be required that the prohibition on substitution be manually initialed by the prescriber.

(f) Selection pursuant to this section is within the discretion of the pharmacist, except as provided in subdivision
 (e). A pharmacist who selects an alternative biological product to be dispensed pursuant to this section shall assume the same responsibility for substituting the biological product as would be incurred in filling a prescription for a biological product prescribed by name. There shall be no liability on the prescriber for an act or omission by a pharmacist in selecting, preparing, or dispensing a biological product pursuant to this section. In no case shall the pharmacist select a biological product that meets the requirements of subdivision (a) unless the cost to the patient of the biological product selected is the same or less than the cost of the prescribed biological product. Cost, as used in this subdivision, includes any professional fee that may be charged by the pharmacist.

(g) This section shall apply to all prescriptions, including those presented by or on behalf of persons receiving assistance from the federal government or pursuant to the Medi-Cal Act set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(h) When a selection is made pursuant to this section, the substitution of a biological product shall be communicated to the patient.

(i) The board shall maintain on its public Internet Web site a link to the current list, if available, of biological products determined by the federal Food and Drug Administration to be interchangeable.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Biological product” has the same meaning that applies to that term under
 Section 351 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 262(i)).

(2) “Interchangeable” means a biological product that the federal Food and Drug Administration has determined meets the standards set forth in Section
 262(k)(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or has been deemed therapeutically equivalent by the federal Food and Drug Administration as set forth in the latest addition or supplement of the Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations.

(3) “Prescription,” with respect to a biological product, means a prescription for a product that is subject to Section 503(b) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 353(b)).

(k) This section shall not prohibit the
 administration of immunizations, as permitted in Sections 4052 and 4052.8.

(l) This section shall not prohibit a disability insurer or health care service plan from requiring prior authorization or imposing other appropriate utilization controls in approving coverage for any biological product.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 545, Sec. 1.   (SB 671)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4074.

(a) A pharmacist shall inform a patient orally or in writing of the harmful effects of a drug dispensed by prescription if both of the following apply:

(1) The drug poses substantial risk to the person consuming the drug when taken in combination with alcohol or the drug may impair a person’s ability to drive a motor vehicle, whichever is applicable.

(2) The drug is determined by the board pursuant to subdivision (c) to be a drug or drug type for which this warning shall be given.

(b) In
 addition to the requirement described in subdivision (a), on and after July 1, 2014, if a pharmacist exercising his or her professional judgment determines that a drug may impair a person’s ability to operate a vehicle or vessel, the pharmacist shall include a written label on the drug container indicating that the drug may impair a person’s ability to operate a vehicle or vessel. The label required by this subdivision may be printed on an auxiliary label that is affixed to the prescription container.

(c) The board may by regulation require additional information or labeling.

(d) This section shall not apply to a drug furnished to a patient in conjunction with treatment or emergency services provided in a health facility or, except as provided in subdivision (e), to a drug
 furnished to a patient pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4056.

(e) A health facility shall establish and implement a written policy to ensure that each patient shall receive information regarding each drug given at the time of discharge and each drug given pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4056. This information shall include the use and storage of each drug, the precautions and relevant warnings, and the importance of compliance with directions. This information shall be given by a pharmacist or registered nurse, unless already provided by a patient’s prescriber,
 and the written policy shall be developed in collaboration with a physician, a pharmacist, and a registered nurse. The written policy shall be approved by the medical staff. Nothing in this subdivision or any other law shall be construed to require that only a pharmacist provide this consultation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   (AB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4075.

No prescription for a controlled substance transmitted by means of an oral or electronically transmitted order shall be furnished to any person unknown and unable to properly establish his or her identity. The board may by regulation establish procedures to prevent unauthorized persons from receiving prescription drugs furnished to a patient or a representative of the patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4076.

(a) A pharmacist shall not dispense a prescription except in a container that meets the requirements of state and federal law and is correctly labeled with all of the following:
